Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1801
Purpose of sections.

(1) The purpose of sections 44-1801 to 44-1806 is to subject to the jurisdiction of the Director of Insurance and to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state insurers not authorized to transact business in this state which place in or send into this state any false advertising designed to induce residents of this state to purchase insurance from insurers not authorized to transact business in this state. The Legislature declares it is in the interest of the citizens of this state who purchase insurance from insurers which solicit insurance business in this state in the manner set forth in the preceding sentence that such insurers be subject to the provisions of sections 44-1801 to 44-1806. In furtherance of such state interest, the Legislature herein exercises its power to protect its residents and also exercises powers and privileges available to the state by virtue of Public Law 15, 79th Congress of the United States, Chapter 20, 1st Session, S. 340, which declares that the business of insurance and every person engaged therein shall be subject to the laws of the several states, the authority provided herein to be in addition to any existing powers of this state.

(2) The provisions of sections 44-1801 to 44-1806 shall be liberally construed.

Laws 1965, c. 247, § 1, p. 698;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 62.